Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to fund a violence prevention project research center that operates as a nonprofit, nonpartisan research center dedicated to reducing violence in society and using data and analysis to improve criminal justice-related policy and practice in Minnesota. The research center must place an emphasis on issues related to gun violence. The base for this activity is $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $0 in fiscal year 2029. new text end